apertium-chv.chv.lexc
LEXICON NUM-PĔRRE
! Standard numerals, напр. пӗрре/иккӗ

%<num%>:                                                       K ;
%<num%>:%>мӗш                                                  NUM-ORD;  ! пӗрремӗш 

LEXICON NUM-PĔRRE-SHORT

%<num%>%<attr%>:                                               # ;       ! пӗр
%<num%>%<coll%>:%>и                                            NUM-COLL; ! пӗри

LEXICON NUM
! Standard numerals, напр. пӗрре/иккӗ

%<num%>:                                                       K ;       ! иккӗ
%<num%>:%>мӗш                                                  NUM-ORD;  ! иккӗмӗш
%<num%>%<coll%>:%>%{Ă%}шӗ                                      NUM-COLL; ! иккӗшӗ     тӑваттӑшӗ


LEXICON NUM-SHORT 
! Short form numerals, e.g. пӗр/икӗ

%<num%>%<attr%>:                                               # ;

LEXICON NUM-OVERSHORT 
! Overshort form numerals, e.g. ик/улт

%<num%>%<attr%>:                                               # "weight: 1.0" ;
%<num%>%<dist%>:%>ш%{A%}р                                      NUM-DIST ; 


LEXICON POST
! Real postpositions, e.g. валли, пирки

%<post%>:	                                               # ;

LEXICON CC
! Coordinating conjunctions

%<cnjcoo%>:                                                    #;

LEXICON CS
! Subordinating conjunctions, small class, check carefully.

%<cnjsub%>:                                                    #;


LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>:                                                    #;


LEXICON ADJ-COMP
                                                               #;
%<advl%>:                                                      #; ! Dir/RL

LEXICON A1
! Adjectives which do not permit substantivisation or comparison,
! small class, check carefully.

%<adj%>:                                                       K;
%<adj%>%<advl%>:                                               K; ! Dir/RL

LEXICON A2
! Adjectives which permit both substantivisation and comparison
! and do not end in -р, -л, -н, -и, -у, -ӳ
! Stems ending in -V or -C (but not -р, -л, -н) have <comp> -рAх

%<adj%>:                                                       CLIT-COP ;
%<adj%>:                                                       SUBST-SKER-I ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>:	                                       POSS ;		! ҫамрӑксем
%<adj%>%<advl%>:                                               K; ! Dir/RL
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}х                                      ADJ-COMP ; 

LEXICON A2-R
! Adjectives which permit both substantivisation and comparison
! and end in -р
! Stems ending in -р have <comp> -тAрAх

%<adj%>:                                                       CLIT-COP ;
%<adj%>:                                                       SUBST-SKER-I ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>:	                                       POSS ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>:                                               K; ! Dir/RL
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>т%{A%}р%{A%}х                                ADJ-COMP ; 

LEXICON A2-LN
! Adjectives which permit both substantivisation and comparison
! and end in -л or -н
! Stems ending in -л, -н have <comp> -рAх and -тAрAх

%<adj%>:                                                       CLIT-COP ;
%<adj%>:                                                       SUBST-SKER-I ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>:	                                       POSS ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>:                                               K; ! Dir/RL
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}х                                      ADJ-COMP ; 
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>т%{A%}р%{A%}х                                ADJ-COMP "weight: 1.0" ; 

LEXICON A2-IUÜ
! Adjectives which permit both substantivisation and comparison
! and end in -и, -у, -ӳ
! Stems ending in -V have <comp> -рAх
! Stems ending in -и, -у, -ӳ do not have +и<subst>

%<adj%>:                                                       CLIT-COP ;
%<adj%>:                                                       SUBST-SKER ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>:	                                       POSS ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>:                                               K; ! Dir/RL
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}х                                      ADJ-COMP ; 


LEXICON ADV1
! Adverbs without comparison

%<adv%>:                                                       K;

LEXICON ADV2
! Adverbs with comparison

%<adv%>:                                                       K;
%<adv%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}х                                      K ; 
%<adv%>%<comp%>:%>т%{A%}р%{A%}х                                K "weight: 1.0" ; 

LEXICON ADV-ITG
! Interrogative adverbs, sometimes lexicalised pronominal forms, 
! e.g. ӑҫта? мӗнле?

%<adv%>%<itg%>:	                                               CLIT-HA;

LEXICON ABBR
! Abbreviations, e.g. км, кг

%<abbr%>:                                                      # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON V-PERS-PRES-REG

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{Ă%}п                                          CLIT-COP;!""     пӗлетӗп      уҫатӑп
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>п%{Ă%}р                                         CLIT-COP;!""     пӗлетпӗр     уҫатпӑр	килетӗнччӗ
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{Ă%}н                                          CLIT-COP;!""     пӗлетӗн      уҫатӑн
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{Ă%}р                                          CLIT-COP;!""     пӗлетӗр      уҫатӑр
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%{ԁ%}                                             CLIT-COP;!""     пӗлет        уҫать

LEXICON V-PERS-PAST-12

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{Ă%}м                                          CLIT-COP;!""
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{Ă%}м%{Ă%}р                                    CLIT-COP;!""
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{Ă%}н                                          CLIT-COP;!""
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{Ă%}р                                          CLIT-COP;!""

LEXICON V-PERS-PAST-3

%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>ӗ                                               CLIT-COP;!""
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>ӗҫ                                              CLIT-COP;!""

LEXICON V-PERS-PAST
V-PERS-PAST-12 ;
V-PERS-PAST-3 ;

LEXICON V-PERS-PLU

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>с%{A%}тт                                        V-PERS-PAST-12;!""	! Сергеев, Андреева, Котлеев 2012: 367
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{A%}тч                                        V-PERS-PAST-3;!""

LEXICON V-PERS-PREP

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}тт                                         V-PERS-PAST-12;!""	! Сергеев, Андреева, Котлеев 2012: 365
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}тч                                         V-PERS-PAST-3;!""

LEXICON V-PERS-PREP-NEG

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>т                                               V-PERS-PAST-12;!""	! Сергеев, Андреева, Котлеев 2012: 365
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>тч                                              V-PERS-PAST-3;!""

LEXICON V-PERS-DUR

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>тт                                              V-PERS-PAST-12;!""
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>тч                                              V-PERS-PAST-3;!""

LEXICON V-PERS-FUT

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{Ă%}п                                          CLIT-COP;!""
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{Ă%}п%{Ă%}р                                    CLIT-COP;!""
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{Ă%}н                                          CLIT-COP;!""
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{Ă%}р                                          CLIT-COP;!""
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{ӗ%}                                           CLIT-COP;!""
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{ӗ%}ҫ                                          CLIT-COP;!""


LEXICON V-PERS-COND

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{Ă%}т%>т%{Ă%}м                                 CLIT-COP;!""	! Сергеев, Андреева, Котлеев 2012: 372
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{Ă%}т%>т%{Ă%}м%{Ă%}р                           CLIT-COP;!""
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{Ă%}т%>т%{Ă%}н                                 CLIT-COP;!""
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{Ă%}т%>т%{Ă%}р                                 CLIT-COP;!""
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{ӗ%}ч%>ч%{ӗ%}                                  CLIT-COP;!""
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{ӗ%}ч%>ч%{ӗ%}ҫ                                 CLIT-COP;!""

LEXICON Adjectives 
пултаруллӑ:пултаруллӑ A1 ; ! ""
административлӑ:административлӑ A1 ; ! ""
хваттерлӗ:хваттерлӗ A1 ; ! ""
кӑҫалхи:кӑҫалхи A1 ; ! ""
хирĕҫле:хирĕҫле A1 ; ! ""
йӑкӑл-якӑл:йӑкӑл-якӑл A2-LN;!""
катари:катари            A2-IUÜ;!""
мӑран:мӑран A2-LN;!""
салху:салху            A2-IUÜ;!""
ҫӳлте:ҫӳлте            A2;!""
сулхӑн:сулхӑн A2-LN;!""
тулашри:тулашри            A2-IUÜ;!""
ушкӑн:ушкӑн A2-LN;!""
чӑмӑр:чӑмӑр A2-R;!""
чуман:чуман A2-LN;!""
юлашки:юлашки            A2-IUÜ;!""
мамӑклӑ:мамӑклӑ                  A2 ; !""
теветкел:теветкел A2-LN ; !""
якӑлти:якӑлти A2-IUÜ; ! "болтливый надоедник; вертлявый"
хухӑр:хухӑр A2-R; ! "то же, что хуйхӑр"
хатӗрлӗ:хатӗрлӗ A2; ! "имеющий приданое (о девицах)"
тӳрмен:тӳрмен A2-LN; ! "неотесанный, резкий, грубый; ленивый; непокладистый, своенравный; упрямый, негодный"
тӳпеми:тӳпеми A2-IUÜ; ! "полно, с верхом, с походом (о сыпучих телах, меде)"
патрак:патрак A2; ! "батрак; название растения; хрупкий, ломкий; часть бирки, остающейся в руках у плательщика; при проверке уплаты, например, хлеба, она прикладывалась к бирке"
ем-ешӗл:ем-ешӗл A2-LN; ! "зеленый-раззеленый"
вашак:вашак A2; ! "нервный и торопливый"
арсӑр-йышсӑр:арсӑр-йышсӑр A2-R; ! "без мужа и без семьи"
нейтронлӑ:нейтронлӑ A1 ; ! ""
муниципаллӑ:муниципаллӑ A1 ; ! ""
административлӑ:административлӑ A1 ; ! ""
дипломлӑ:дипломлӑ A2; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
историчченхи:историчченхи A2-IUÜ; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
йӑлхар:йӑлхар A2-R; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
пархатарсӑр:пархатарсӑр A2-R; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
пӗлтерӗшлӗ:пӗлтерӗшлӗ A2; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
ҫанӑсӑр:ҫанӑсӑр A2-R; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
тӑрӑлти:тӑрӑлти A2-IUÜ; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
тумлӑ-сумлӑ:тумлӑ-сумлӑ A2; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
ударенисӗр:ударенисӗр A2-R; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
чунсӑр:чунсӑр A2-R; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
LEXICON Adverbs
ӑҫталла:ӑҫталла            ADV-ITG;!""
ӑҫта:ӑҫта            ADV-ITG;!""
ӑҫтан:ӑҫтан            ADV-ITG;!""
мӗнле:мӗнле ADV-ITG ; ! ""
мӗншӗн:мӗншӗн            ADV-ITG ; ! ""
хӑҫан:хӑҫан    ADV-ITG ; ! ""
вӗри:вӗри            ADV1 ; ! ""
кайранхи:кайранхи            ADV1 ; ! ""
кинет:кинет ADV1 ; ! "неожиданно, вдруг, сразу"
наян:наян            ADV1 ; ! ""
пушкӑртла:пушкӑртла ADV1 ; ! "по-башкирски, как башкир"
сисмесле:сисмесле ADV1 ; ! "незаметно, тихонько"
ӳсӗрле:ӳсӗрле ADV1 ; ! "в состоянии опьянения"
ыран-паян:ыран-паян ADV1 ; ! "не нынче, завтра, в весьма скором времени"
вӑйлӑн:вӑйлӑн ADV2; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
йӑлӑнчӑклӑн:йӑлӑнчӑклӑн ADV2; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
кубла:кубла ADV2; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
нӗрсӗррӗн:нӗрсӗррӗн ADV2; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
садистла:садистла ADV2; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
ҫӑханла:ҫӑханла ADV2; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
тивӗҫлӗн:тивӗҫлӗн ADV2; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
хапӑллӑн:хапӑллӑн ADV2; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
LEXICON Numerals
пӗрре:пӗрре                  NUM-PĔRRE ;!""
пӗрре:пӗр                    NUM-PĔRRE-SHORT ;!""
иккӗ:икӗ                     NUM-SHORT ;!""
иккӗ:ик                      NUM-OVERSHORT ;!""
виҫҫӗ:виҫӗ                   NUM-SHORT ;!""
виҫҫӗ:виҫ                    NUM-OVERSHORT ;!""
тӑваттӑ:тӑватӑ               NUM-SHORT ;!""
тӑваттӑ:тӑват                NUM-OVERSHORT ;!""
пиллӗк:пиллӗк                NUM ;!""
пиллӗк:пилӗк                 NUM-SHORT ;!""
улттӑ:ултӑ                   NUM-SHORT ;!""
улттӑ:улт                    NUM-OVERSHORT ;!""
ҫиччӗ:ҫичӗ                   NUM-SHORT ;!""
ҫиччӗ:ҫич                     NUM-OVERSHORT ;!""
саккӑр:сакӑр                 NUM-SHORT ;!""
тӑххӑр:тӑххӑр                NUM ;!""
тӑххӑр:тӑхӑр                 NUM-SHORT ;!""
вуннӑ:вунӑ                   NUM-SHORT ;!""
вуннӑ:вун                    NUM-OVERSHORT ;!""
вуникӗ:вуникӗ                    NUM ;!""
вунвиҫ:вунвиҫ                    NUM ;!""
вунпиллӗк:вунпиллӗк                    NUM ;!""
вунулт:вунулт                    NUM ;!""
ҫирӗм:ҫирӗм                    NUM ;!""
сакӑрвун:сакӑрвун                   NUM ;!""
триллион:триллион                    NUM ;!""
 LEXICON Abbreviations
км³:км3 ABBR ;  ! "km³" ! Dir/LR
АурАзЭБ:АурАзЭБ ABBR ; !""
геол%.:геол%. ABBR ; !""
КазТАГ:КазТАГ ABBR ; !""
лат%.:лат%. ABBR ; !""
НКВД:НКВД ABBR ; !""
ТЭЦ:ТЭЦ ABBR ; !""
т%.:т%. ABBR ; !""
